src/fst/morphology/incoming/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON sii-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@síí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sii   #;	
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;	
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;	

LEXICON sii-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #;
! When an inner prefix is present, 1SG forms also appear as Cas (e.g.,
! dìsists'ón ~ dasts'ón "I heard (it)", zìsisyín ~ zasyín "I killed (it)".
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@as     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;

LEXICON sii-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s      #;

LEXICON sii-AFF-OuterPrefix
! Two 3S forms are possible here (e.g., tách'ásgàd, tách'ásiigàd "3S rode away")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@síí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sii   #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;	
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #; 


!
! yi-y-PFV
!
LEXICON yi-y-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@@D.PREFIX@          yi-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@@R.PREFIX.INNER@    yi-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@   yi-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-y@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@    yi-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yis-y@@D.PREFIX@         yis-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yis-y@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   yis-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yis-y@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  yis-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yis-y@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   yis-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;


LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;

LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;

LEXICON yi-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;


LEXICON yis-y-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;

LEXICON yis-y-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;

LEXICON yis-y-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;


!
! yi-a-PFV
!

LEXICON yi-a-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@D.PREFIX@          yi-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@R.PREFIX.INNER@    yi-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@   yi-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yi-a@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@    yi-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yii-a@@D.PREFIX@         yii-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yii-a@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   yii-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yii-a@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  yii-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.yii-a@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   yii-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;  

LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;

LEXICON yi-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;  


LEXICON yii-a-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;  

LEXICON yii-a-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #; 

LEXICON yii-a-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;  


!
! yi-PROG
!
LEXICON yi-PROG

@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@D.PREFIX@         yi-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   yi-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  yi-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yi@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   yi-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yis@@D.PREFIX@        yis-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@  yis-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ yis-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  yis-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yii@@D.PREFIX@        yii-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@  yii-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@ yii-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PROG@@U.TAMA.yii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@  yii-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #;  

LEXICON yi-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yi    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@á     #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@á     #; 


LEXICON yis-PROG-AFF-NoPrefix
! TODO: 3S form needs to be verified (e.g., O yáswush or O yiswùsh?)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yás   #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ás    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ás    #;

LEXICON yis-PROG-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ás    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ás    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ás    #;

LEXICON yis-PROG-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ás    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ás    #;
